Utah statutes.
49-20-105.   Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to provide a mechanism for covered employers to
provide covered individuals with group health, dental, medical, disability,
life insurance, medicare supplement, conversion coverage, cafeteria, flex
plan, and other programs requested by the state, its political subdivisions,
or educational institutions in the most efficient and economical manner.
